Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-218
County clerk perform duties of election commissioner; when; deputy county clerk for elections.

(1) The county clerk shall have the powers and perform the duties assigned to the election commissioner except in those counties which have an election commissioner as provided by section 32-207 or 32-211. The powers and duties assigned to the county clerk in the Election Act relating to the registration of voters and the conduct of elections shall only apply to county clerks in counties without an election commissioner. The county clerk may hire additional personnel to perform the duties assigned under the act.

(2) The county board may establish the position of deputy county clerk for elections. Such deputy shall be appointed by the county clerk and shall not be a member of the same political party as the county clerk, except that any deputy county clerk for elections serving on January 1, 1995, shall be allowed to continue in his or her position for as long as he or she holds the position. Under the direction of the county clerk, the deputy shall be primarily responsible for performing the duties imposed on the county clerk by the election laws of this state and shall perform such other duties as may from time to time be assigned to him or her by the county clerk. The deputy shall serve at the pleasure of the county clerk. The county board shall determine the compensation of the deputy.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 38.